Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Disabled and Absent Voters

117.075.
Mail-in absentee ballots for voters with disabilities. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 247, § 3; 1978, ch. 222, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 73, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 141, § 56, effective July 1, 1982; 1982, ch. 360, § 38, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 394, § 9, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 185, § 7, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 287, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 470, § 8, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 16, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 65, § 1, effective March 19, 1992; 1994, ch. 394, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 405, § 14, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 243, § 4, effective April 1, 1998; 2010, ch. 176, § 4, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 190, § 6, effective April 11, 2017; repealed by 2019 ch. 112, § 8, effective June 27, 2019.

117.076.
No-excuse in-person absentee ballot — Excused in-person absentee ballot — Proof of identification — In-person absentee voting procedure — Voter assistance form — Oath of voter affidavit — Signature roster — Members of county board may serve as precinct officers — Challengers — Locking of voting equipment — Transmitting or publicizing count — Tamper-resistant seal — Administrative regulations.

Any voter who is qualified to vote on election day in the county of his or her residence may choose to cast a no-excuse in-person absentee ballot on the Thursday, Friday, or Saturday immediately preceding the day of an election. The available hours from which a voter may cast his or her vote during these three (3) days shall be no less than eight (8) hours between 6 a.m. and 8 p.m. prevailing time, as determined by the county board of elections of each county.

Any voter who is qualified to vote on election day in the county of his or her residence may make application to cast an excused in-person absentee ballot during normal business hours during the six (6) business days immediately preceding the Thursday of no-excuse in-person absentee voting under subsection (1) of this section. The voter who makes application under this subsection shall meet one (1) of the following requirements in order to cast his or her excused in-person absentee ballot:

Is a resident of Kentucky who is a covered voter as defined in KRS

117A.010

, who will be absent from the county of his or her residence on the day of an election and during the days of no-excuse in-person absentee voting;

Has surgery, or whose spouse has surgery, scheduled that will require hospitalization on the day of an election and during the days of no-excuse in-person absentee voting;

Temporarily resides outside the state, but is still eligible to vote in this state and will be absent from the county of his or her residence on the day of an election and during the days of no-excuse in-person absentee voting;

Is a resident of Kentucky who is a uniformed-service voter as defined in KRS

117A.010

confined to a military base on election day and during the days of no-excuse in-person absentee voting;

Is in her last trimester of pregnancy and the voter completes the form that is prescribed by the State Board of Elections, which contains a sworn statement that the voter is in her last trimester of pregnancy at the time she wishes to vote;

Has not been declared mentally disabled by a court of competent jurisdiction and, due to age, disability, or illness, is not able to appear at the polls on election day and during the days of no-excuse in-person absentee voting;

Is a student who temporarily resides outside the county of his or her residence and will be absent from the county of his or her residence on the day of an election and during the days of no-excuse in-person absentee voting;

Any person employed in an occupation that is scheduled to work during all days and all hours, which shall include commute time, the polls are open on election day and during the days of no-excuse in-person absentee voting; or

Any election officer tasked with election administration for the current election cycle.

Any voter who votes an in-person absentee or federal provisional in-person absentee ballot shall provide proof of identification as defined in KRS

117.001

or meet the requirements of KRS

117.228

or

117.229

.

In-person absentee voting shall be conducted in a location within the county clerk’s office where ballots shall be cast secretly. In-person absentee voting may occur in another location within the county if the location is designated by the county board of elections and approved by the State Board of Elections. The county clerk may provide for voting by the voting equipment in general use in the county or any other voting equipment approved by the State Board of Elections for use in Kentucky. Public notice of the locations shall be given pursuant to KRS Chapter 424, and similar notice by mail shall be given to the county chairs of the two (2) political parties whose candidates polled the largest number of votes in the county at the last regular election.

Any voter qualifying to vote who receives assistance to vote in-person absentee shall complete the voter assistance form required by KRS

117.255

.

Any voter qualifying to vote whose qualifications are challenged on grounds other than inability to provide proof of identification by any clerk or deputy shall complete an oath of voter affidavit.

Each voter casting his or her vote in-person absentee shall sign an in-person absentee ballot signature roster.

The members of the county board of elections, or their designees who provide equal representation of both political parties, may serve as precinct election officers, without compensation, for all in-person absentee voting conducted. If the members of the county board of elections or their designees serve as precinct election officers for in-person absentee voting, they shall perform the same duties and exercise the same authority as precinct election officers who serve on the day of an election. If the members of the county board of elections or their designees do not serve as precinct election officers for in-person absentee voting, the county clerk or deputy county clerks shall supervise the in-person absentee voting.

Any individual qualified to appoint challengers for the day of an election may also appoint challengers to observe all in-person absentee voting, and those challengers may exercise the same privileges as challengers appointed for observing voting on the day of an election at a regular polling place.

During the days of in-person absentee voting, all voting equipment on which in-person absentee ballots are cast shall remain locked and the keys shall be retained by at least two (2) members of the central ballot counting board who are not of the same political affiliation or by two (2) members of the county board of elections who are not of the same political affiliation, and the voting equipment shall remain locked with a tamper-resistant seal until the ballots are counted.

No person shall transmit or publicize any tallies or counts of in-person absentee ballots, or any partial results, to any person except those persons, election officials, or entities authorized by law to receive it, until 6 p.m. prevailing time on the day of a primary or an election.

Before and after each day of in-person absentee voting, on all voting equipment to be used, the tamper-resistant seal shall be checked to ensure it is unaltered and the number on the public counter shall be read and recorded. The status of the tamper-resistant seal shall be indicated and the number on the public counter of each voting equipment shall be recorded by the county clerk or his or her designated election official, member of the county board of elections, or member of the central ballot counting board. The status of the tamper-resistant seal and the number recorded from the public counter shall be witnessed by an election official who is of a different political affiliation than the person recording.

The status of the tamper-resistant seal and the number on the public counter shall be recorded on a form prescribed and furnished by the State Board of Elections pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A.

The witness who is present shall verify, through validity of his or her signature on the form provided, the accuracy of the number recorded from the public counter, the number recorded on the prescribed form, and the status of the tamper-resistant seal.

Any irregularities observed by the election official who is recording and the election official who is a witness shall be immediately reported to the county attorney or the Office of Attorney General.

The State Board of Elections shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to provide for the casting of ballots in accordance with this section.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 87, § 3, effective April 7, 2022.

117.077.
Absentee
ballot for medical emergencies.

In case of a medical emergency
within fourteen (14) days or less of an election, a registered voter and the
registered voter’s spouse may apply for an absentee ballot. The application
shall state that the emergency condition occurred within the fourteen (14)
day period. The application shall be notarized. The application form may be
requested by and delivered by the voter or the spouse, parents, or children
of the voter. If the voter has no spouse, parents, or children, the application
form may be requested by and delivered by the brother, sister, niece, nephew,
or designee of the voter. The application form shall be restricted to the
use of the voter. Upon receipt of the application and verification, the county
clerk shall issue an absentee ballot.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 287, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 17, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 394, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 243, § 5, effective April 1, 1998; 2002, ch. 3, § 1, effective Feburary 15, 2002.

117.079.
Administrative regulations for absentee voting by military and overseas voters.

The provisions of KRS

117.076

,

117.085

,

117.086

, and Chapter 117A notwithstanding, the State Board of Elections shall, as circumstances warrant and with the concurrence of the Attorney General, promulgate necessary administrative regulations to preserve the absentee voting rights of residents of Kentucky who are covered voters as defined in KRS

117A.010

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 1, effective March 1, 1991; 2013, ch. 131, § 21, effective July 1, 2014; 2022 ch. 87, § 6, effective April 7, 2022.

117.085.
Mail-in absentee ballots — Application through online portal and other means — Procedures — Cancellation — Administrative regulations — Disclosure of information.

All requests for a mail-in absentee ballot shall be requested through a secure online portal established by the State Board of Elections, except for:

Voters identified in KRS

117.077

;

Disabled voters; and

Covered voters in paragraph (i) of this subsection;

who have the additional option of requesting a mail-in absentee ballot application through the county clerk.

Acquiring a mail-in absentee ballot by means of the online portal shall require the voter to input personally identifiable information for verification.

For those voters who do not have the means of accessing the online portal, the county clerk shall fulfill a request for a mail-in absentee ballot by taking the voter’s information over the telephone or in person and directly inputting that information into the secure online portal.

The online portal shall have the capacity to ensure the identity of the voter through proof of identification as required under KRS

117.227

or by means of KRS

117.228

.

If a voter qualifies to receive a mail-in absentee ballot, the online portal shall transmit the mail-in absentee ballot request to the county clerk of the county in which the voter is registered to vote.

The online portal shall not be open or permit any mail-in ballot requests to occur more than forty-five (45) days immediately preceding the day of a primary or an election. The online portal shall close at 11:59 p.m. local time, fourteen (14) days immediately preceding the day of a primary or an election.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

117.077

, the mail-in absentee ballot may be requested by the voter or the spouse, parents, or children of the voter, but shall be restricted to the use of the voter.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS 117.077 and covered voters in paragraph (i) of this subsection, a qualified voter may apply to cast his or her vote by mail-in absentee ballot if the completed application is received fourteen (14) days before the election, and if the voter is:

A resident of Kentucky who is a covered voter as defined in KRS

117A.010

;

A student who temporarily resides outside the county of his or her residence;

Incarcerated in jail and charged with a crime, but has not been convicted of the crime;

Changing or has changed his or her place of residence to a different state while the registration books are closed in the new state of residence before an election of electors for President and Vice President of the United States, in which case the voter shall be permitted to cast a mail-in absentee ballot for electors for President and Vice President of the United States only;

Temporarily residing outside the state but still eligible to vote in this state;

Prevented from voting in person at the polls on election day and from casting an excused or no-excuse in-person absentee ballot on all days in-person absentee voting is conducted because he or she will be absent from the county of his or her residence all hours and all days excused or no-excuse in-person absentee voting is conducted;

A participant in the Secretary of State’s crime victim address confidentiality protection program as authorized by KRS

14.312

; or

Not able to appear at the polls on election day or the days excused or no-excuse in-person absentee voting is conducted on the account of age, disability, or illness, and who has not been declared mentally disabled by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Residents of Kentucky who are covered voters as defined in KRS

117A.010

may apply for a mail-in absentee ballot by means of the federal post-card application, which may be transmitted to the county clerk’s office by mail, by facsimile machine, or by means of the electronic transmission system established under KRS 117A.030(4). The federal post-card application may be used to register, reregister, and to apply for a mail-in absentee ballot. If the federal post-card application is received at any time not less than seven (7) days before the election, the county clerk shall affix his or her seal to the application form upon receipt.

Any qualified voter who is disabled may use an accessible mail-in absentee ballot portal to request and receive a mail-in absentee ballot by means of an electronic transmission system as established under KRS 117A.030(4). The standards necessary to implement this paragraph shall be set by the State Board of Elections pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A.

For those voters who are eligible to receive a mail-in absentee ballot by means other than the secure online portal pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the county clerk shall type the name of the voter permitted to vote by mail-in absentee ballot on the mail-in absentee ballot application for that person’s use and no other. The mail-in absentee ballot application shall be in the form prescribed by the State Board of Elections, which shall include the voter affirmation form as prescribed in KRS 117.228(1)(c) and shall contain the following information: name, residential address, precinct, party affiliation, statement of the reason the person cannot vote in person on the day of an election or during the dates and time no-excuse in-person absentee voting is being conducted, statement of where the voter shall be on election day or during the dates and times no-excuse in-person absentee voting is being conducted, statement of compliance with residency requirements for voting in the precinct, an instructional statement prescribing the requirements for providing a copy of the voter’s proof of identification or voter affirmation when applicable, and the voter’s mailing address for a mail-in absentee ballot. The mail-in absentee ballot application form shall be verified and signed by the voter, and the voter shall provide a copy of his or her proof of identification, as defined in KRS

117.001

, or the executed voter affirmation as described in KRS 117.228(1)(c). A notice of the actual penalty provisions in KRS 117.995(2) and (5) shall be printed on the mail-in absentee ballot application form.

For those voters eligible to receive a mail-in absentee ballot, if the county clerk finds that the voter has completed and submitted an application for a mail-in absentee ballot as provided in this section, is properly registered as stated in his or her mail-in absentee ballot application, and qualifies to receive a mail-in absentee ballot by mail, the county clerk shall mail to the voter a mail-in absentee ballot, two (2) official envelopes for returning the mail-in absentee ballot, and instructions for voting.

Mail-in absentee ballots shall be mailed to a voter’s residential address located in the county in which the voter is registered, except for:

Qualified voters who apply pursuant to the requirements of subsection (1)(h)1. to 5. of this section; or

Qualified voters covered under KRS

117.077

.

The county clerk shall:

Transmit a mail-in absentee ballot to the voter who is eligible to receive a mail-in absentee ballot within four (4) days of receipt or within four (4) days of the ballots being available;

Cause mail-in absentee ballots to be printed fifty (50) days prior to each primary or regular election, and forty-five (45) days prior to a special election; and

Complete a postal form for a certificate of mailing for mail-in absentee ballots mailed within the fifty (50) states, and it shall be stamped by the postal service when the mail-in absentee ballots are mailed. Unless a postal form for a certificate of mailing is required, the county clerk may use methods of tracking the mail-in absentee ballots by means of a printed barcode or other label that is unique to the individual voter issued by the State Board of Elections pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A.

A mail-in absentee ballot may be transmitted by facsimile machine or by the electronic transmission system established under KRS 117A.030(4) to a covered voter as defined in KRS

117A.010

. The covered voter shall be notified of the options for transmittal of the mail-in absentee ballot, and the mail-in absentee ballot shall be transmitted by the method chosen for receipt by the resident of Kentucky who is a covered voter.

The outer envelope of the mail-in absentee ballot shall bear the words “Absentee Ballot”, the address and official title of the county clerk, a printed barcode or other label that is unique to the individual voter issued by the State Board of Elections, and adequate space for the voter’s signature, voting address, precinct number, and signatures of two (2) witnesses if the voter signs the form with the use of a mark instead of the voter’s signature. A detachable flap on the secrecy envelope shall provide space for the voter’s signature, voting address, precinct number, signatures of two (2) witnesses if the voter signs the form with the use of a mark instead of the voter’s signature and notice of penalty provided in KRS 117.995(5). The county clerk shall type the voter’s address and precinct number in the upper left hand corner of the outer envelope and of the detachable flap on the secrecy envelope immediately below the blank space for the voter’s signature. The secrecy envelope shall be blank. If applicable, the county clerk shall retain the voter’s mail-in ballot application, which shall include the photographed copy of the voter’s proof of identification or the voter affirmation as prescribed by KRS 117.228(1)(c), and the postal form required by subsection (5) of this section for twenty-two (22) months after the primary or election.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (10) of this section, any person who has received a mail-in absentee ballot but who knows at least seven (7) days before the date of the election that he or she will be in his or her county of residence on election day or during the days of no-excuse in-person absentee voting and who has not voted by means of his or her mail-in absentee ballot shall cancel his or her mail-in absentee ballot and vote in person. The voter shall return the mail-in absentee ballot to the county clerk’s office by mail or hand delivery no later than seven (7) days prior to the date of the election. Upon the return of the mail-in absentee ballot, the county clerk shall mark on the outer envelope of the sealed ballot or the unmarked ballot the words “Canceled because voter appeared to vote in person.” Sealed envelopes so marked shall not be opened. The county clerk shall remove the voter’s name from the list of persons who were sent mail-in absentee ballots, and the voter may vote in the precinct in which he or she is properly registered.

Any voter qualified for a mail-in absentee ballot who does not receive a requested mail-in absentee ballot within a reasonable amount of time shall contact the county clerk, who shall reissue a second mail-in absentee ballot. The county clerk shall keep a record of the mail-in absentee ballots issued and returned by mail, hand-delivered, or placed in a secure drop-box or receptacle, and the in-person absentee voting and federal in-person provisional absentee voting that is conducted, to verify that only the first voted ballot is counted. Upon the return of any mail-in absentee ballot after the first mail-in absentee ballot is returned, the county clerk shall mark on the outer envelope of the sealed ballot the words “Canceled because ballot reissued.”

Any covered voter as defined in KRS

117A.010

who has received a mail-in absentee ballot but who knows that he or she will be in the county on election day or during the days of no-excuse in-person absentee voting shall cancel his or her mail-in absentee ballot and vote in person during the days of no-excuse in-person absentee voting or on the day of the election. The voter shall return the mail-in absentee ballot to the county clerk’s office on or before election day. Upon the return of the mail-in absentee ballot, the county clerk shall mark on the outer envelope of the sealed mail-in absentee ballot or the unmarked mail-in absentee ballot the words “Canceled because voter appeared to vote in person.” Sealed envelopes so marked shall not be opened. The county clerk shall remove the voter’s name from the list of persons who were sent mail-in absentee ballots, allow the voter to vote by means of no-excuse in-person absentee ballot, or provide the voter with written authorization to vote at the precinct on election day. If the voter is unable to return the mail-in absentee ballot to the county clerk’s office on or before election day, at the time he or she votes in person, he or she shall sign a written oath as to his or her qualifications on a form prescribed by the State Board of Elections pursuant to KRS

117.245

.

The State Board of Elections shall promulgate administrative regulations to:

Ensure election officials have real-time knowledge of which voters have requested mail-in absentee ballots; and

Provide procedures to be followed if a voter attempts to vote more than once at a primary or an election.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

, and except for when the identification of the voter is provided to the county board of elections under KRS

117.087

, the information contained in an application for a mail-in absentee ballot shall not be made public until after the close of business hours on the election day for which the application applies. Except for necessary election officials and for election-related duties as prescribed by law, the name of the person who votes by means of a mail-in absentee ballot shall not be disclosed. This subsection shall not prohibit at any time the disclosure, upon request, of the total number of applications for mail-in absentee ballots that have been filed, or the disclosure to the Secretary of State or the State Board of Elections, if requested or if otherwise required by law, of any information in an application for a mail-in absentee ballot.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 247, § 4; 2017 ch. 190, § 7, effective April 11, 2017; 2019 ch. 112, § 2, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 89, § 5, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 11, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 87, § 7, effective April 7, 2022.

117.0851.
Tabulation of absentee ballots and federal provisional absentee ballots.

Absentee ballots and federal provisional absentee ballots cast, as absentee ballots and federal provisional absentee ballots are provided by
KRS

117.076

117.077

,

117.085

, and

117.229

shall all be tabulated in the same manner, as shall be provided by this chapter.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 287, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 296, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 2019 ch. 112, § 4, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 89, § 6, effective July 15, 2020; 2022 ch. 87, § 8, effective April 7, 2022.

117.086.
Return of absentee ballot — Secure drop-boxes and receptacles — Locked ballot box — Clerk's duty to keep separate lists for votes cast by mail-in absentee ballot, by excused and no-excuse in-person voting, and by federal provisional in-person absentee ballot — Report on rejected absentee ballots.

The voter returning his or her absentee ballot to the county clerk by mail, hand delivery, or to a secure drop-box or receptacle, shall mark his or her ballot, seal it in the secrecy envelope, and then seal the outer envelope.

The voter shall sign the detachable flap and the outer envelope in order to validate the ballot. A person having power of attorney for the voter and who signs the detachable flap and outer envelope for the voter shall complete the voter assistance form as required by KRS

117.255

. The signatures of two (2) witnesses are required if the voter signs the form with the use of a mark instead of the voter’s signature. A resident of Kentucky who is a covered voter as defined in KRS

117A.010

who has received an absentee ballot transmitted by facsimile machine or by means of the electronic transmission system established under KRS 117A.030(4) shall transmit the voted ballot to the county clerk by mail only, conforming with ballot security requirements that may be promulgated by the State Board of Elections by administrative regulation under KRS Chapter 13A. In order to be counted, all mail-in absentee ballots shall be received by the county clerk no later than the time established by the election laws generally for the closing of the polls, which time shall not include the extra hour during which those voters may vote who were waiting in line to vote at the scheduled poll closing time.

The county clerk shall provide a minimum of one (1) secure ballot drop-box to receive voted mail-in absentee ballots for each primary, regular election, or special election. Public notice of all secure ballot drop-box locations shall be given in the same manner as provided under KRS 117.076(4), and posted to the Web site of the county clerk.

The county board of elections may seek the State Board of Elections’ approval of a ballot receptacle to receive voted mail-in absentee ballots for each primary, regular election, or special election. Public notice of all secure ballot receptacle locations shall be given in the same manner as provided under KRS 117.076(4), and posted to the Web site of the county clerk. Before any mail-in absentee ballot shall be allowed to be deposited inside a receptacle, the county board of elections shall inform the State Board of Elections of:

The number of receptacles to be used;

The type of each receptacle to be used; and

The receptacle location.

Any drop-box or receptacle located outside of the county clerk’s office shall be:

Placed in a well-lit and easily accessible location;

Secured to ensure immobility while in use;

Under video surveillance at all times;

Tamper-resistant; and

Conspicuously noted as a mail-in absentee ballot drop-off location.

A drop-box or receptacle located inside the county clerk’s office shall be under direct supervision of the staff of the county clerk at all times and be accessible to the public.

Each receptacle or drop-box shall be emptied by the county clerk and at least one (1) member of the county board of elections or one (1) member of the central ballot counting board if one is appointed, who is not of the same political affiliation as the county clerk at least once each business day or more frequently, as needed, to reasonably secure and accommodate the volume of the voter-delivered mail-in absentee ballots. The ballots deposited in the drop-box or receptacle shall be removed with a record of the date and time ballots were removed, and the names of the persons removing them. If the drop-box or receptacle is located outside the county clerk’s office, the ballots shall be returned to the county clerk in locked transport containers, and the county clerk shall transfer the ballots upon receipt in accordance with subsection (3) of this section.

Except for those times ballots are being removed and transported from a secure ballot drop box to the county clerk as provided in this subsection, the county clerk and at least one (1) member of the county board of elections who is not of the same political affiliation or one (1) member of the central ballot counting board who is not of the same political affiliation as the county clerk, shall retain the keys to all secure ballot drop-boxes, receptacles, and transport containers in use in the county.

The State Board of Elections may establish additional security measures and procedures for the use of the ballot drop-box or receptacle through administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A.

Upon receipt of a mail-in absentee ballot, the county clerk shall scan the barcode or label that is unique to the individual voter to note the receipt of the mail-in absentee ballot, and deposit all of the mail-in absentee ballots in a locked ballot box immediately upon receipt without opening the outer envelope. The ballot box shall be locked with two (2) locks. The keys to the ballot box shall be retained by at least two (2) members of the county board of elections who are not of the same political affiliation or two (2) members of the central ballot counting board if one (1) is appointed, who are not of the same political affiliation, and the box shall remain locked until the ballots are processed, reviewed, or counted under KRS

117.087

.

The county clerk shall keep separate lists for each election of all persons who:

Return their mail-in absentee ballots;

Cast their excused and no-excuse in-person absentee ballots; and

Cast their federal provisional in-person absentee ballots.

The county clerk shall send a copy of each list to the State Board of Elections after any primary or election day. Notwithstanding the provisions of the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

, each list of all persons who return their mail-in absentee ballots or who cast their ballots by means of an excused in-person absentee or no-excuse in-person absentee shall not be made public until after the close of business hours on the primary or election day for which the list applies, except when provided to the county board of elections under KRS

117.087

. The county clerk and the Secretary of State shall keep a record of the number of votes cast by each method listed in paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection, which are cast in any primary or election as a part of the official returns of the primary or election.

The county board of elections shall report to the State Board of Elections within ten (10) days after any primary or regular election as to the number of rejected absentee ballots, including rejected mail-in absentee ballots and ballots cast under subsection (3) of this section, and the reasons for rejecting the ballots on a form prescribed and furnished by the State Board of Elections in administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 46, effective June 21, 1974; 1978, ch. 71, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; repealed and reenact., Acts 1980, ch. 73, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 287, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 470, § 10, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 341, § 28, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 19, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 394, § 12, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 243, § 7, effective April 1, 1998; 1998, ch. 386, § 2, effective April 7, 1998; 2000, ch. 134, § 2, effective March 17, 2000; 2002, ch. 3, § 3, effective February 15, 2002; 2013, ch. 124, § 3, effective June 25, 2013; 2013, ch. 131, § 23, effective July 1, 2014; 2020 ch. 89, § 7, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 12, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 87, § 9, effective April 7, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/7/2022). When this statute was amended in 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 87, sec. 9, what was then subsection (3) was deleted. However, an existing reference elsewhere in the statute to “subsection (3) of this section” was inadvertently left unchanged. That reference appears in the present subsection (5) of this statute.

117.0861.
Persons who may exercise control over mail-in absentee ballots.

No person shall knowingly collect, gain possession of, deliver, or exercise control over a mail-in absentee ballot, except for:

A voter personally casting his or her ballot by means of mail-in absentee ballot;

An election official engaged in official duties as prescribed in KRS Chapters 116 to 120;

A United States Postal Service worker or any other person who is allowed by law to transmit United States mail if the worker or other person is engaged in official duties;

A family member of the voter:

Who shall be related to the voter as set forth in KRS 6.611(16)(a), or as established by marriage, adoption, or legal guardianship; and

Who is designated by the voter to assist in the mail-in absentee voting process;

A person:

Who shares the same residence of the voter; and

Is designated by the voter to assist in the mail-in absentee voting process; and

A caregiver:

Who provides medical or healthcare assistance to the voter in a residence, nursing care institution, hospice facility, assisted living center, assisted living facility, assisted living home, residential care institution, adult day healthcare facility, or adult foster home; and

Who is designated by the voter to assist in the mail-in absentee voting process.

For subsection (1)(d), (e), and (f) of this section, the person designated by the voter shall not have been:

Declared mentally disabled by a court of competent jurisdiction, which adjudication has not been set aside; or

Convicted of an election law offense whose civil rights have not been restored by the Governor.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 197, § 6, effective June 29, 2021.

117.0863.
Assistance in voting by absentee ballot — Form required of voter and assistant.

Except for those voters who have been certified as requiring assistance in voting on a permanent or annual basis, any person voting by means of a mail-in absentee ballot or in-person absentee ballot who receives assistance in voting shall be required to complete the voter assistance form required by KRS

117.255

.

Any person who assists another person in voting by use of an mail-in absentee ballot or in-person absentee ballot shall complete the voter assistance form required by KRS

117.255

.

The detachable flap on all mail-in absentee ballot envelopes shall have printed upon it the voter assistance form required by KRS

117.255

, notice of the penalty for failure to complete the form, and notice of the penalty under KRS

117.0865

.

The State Board of Elections shall promulgate by administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A a voter assistance form which shall be in a form acceptable to the Attorney General.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 341, § 14, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 20, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 394, § 13, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 270, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 243, § 8, effective April 1, 1998; 2020 ch. 89, § 8, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 13, effective June 29, 2021.

117.0865.
Prohibition
against influencing voter completing an absentee ballot or a federal provisional absentee ballot — Penalty.

Any person who aids another in completing an absentee ballot or a federal provisional absentee ballot shall not solicit or encourage that person to vote for or against any candidate, party, or issue. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 341, § 15, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 21, effective July 13, 1990; 2020 ch. 89, § 9, effective July 15, 2020.